Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-723.02
Justice or judge; removal or suspension by Supreme Court; grounds.

In addition to the procedure set forth in sections 24-721 to 24-723, on recommendation of the Commission on Judicial Qualifications or on its own motion, the Supreme Court (1) shall remove a Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge from office when in any court in the United States such Justice or judge pleads guilty or no contest to a crime punishable as a felony under Nebraska or federal law, and (2) may suspend a Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge from office without salary when in any court in the United States such Justice or judge is found guilty of a crime punishable as a felony under Nebraska or federal law or any other crime that involves moral turpitude. If his or her conviction is reversed, suspension shall terminate and he or she shall be paid his or her salary for the period of suspension. If he or she is suspended and his or her conviction becomes final the Supreme Court shall remove him or her from office.

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 10.